Utah statutes.
63M-7-201.   Creation -- Purpose.

(1)  The State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice is created within the governor's office.

(2)  The commission's purpose is to:

(a)  promote broad philosophical agreement concerning the objectives of the criminal and juvenile justice system in Utah;

(b)  provide a mechanism for coordinating the functions of the various branches and levels of government concerned with criminal and juvenile justice to achieve those objectives;

(c)  coordinate statewide efforts to reduce crime and victimization in Utah; and

(d)  accomplish the duties enumerated in Section 63M-7-204.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

